Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1714
Sections, how construed.

Nothing in sections 81-1701 to 81-1721 shall be construed to prohibit continuing contracts between firm and agency.

Laws 1978, LB 715, § 14.